Missouri, session 2026, HB2351.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 302.302, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 302.302, to read as follows:
302.302. 1. The director of revenue shall put into effect a point system for the
suspension and revocation of licenses. Points shall be assessed only after a conviction or
forfeiture of collateral. The initial point value is as follows:
(1) Any moving violation of a state law or county or
municipal or federal traffic ordinance or regulation
not listed in this section, other than a violation of
vehicle equipment provisions or a court-ordered
supervision as provided in section 302.303 2 points
(except any violation of municipal stop sign
ordinance where no accident is involved 1 point)
(2) Speeding
In violation of a state law 3 points
In violation of a county or municipal ordinance 2 points
(3) Leaving the scene of an accident in violation of
section 577.060 12 points
In violation of any county or municipal ordinance 6 points
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2351 2
(4) Careless and imprudent driving in violation of
subsection 4 of section 304.016 4 points
In violation of a county or municipal ordinance 2 points
(5) Operating without a valid license in violation of
subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 1 of section
302.020:
(a) For the first conviction 2 points
(b) For the second conviction 4 points
(c) For the third conviction 6 points
(6) Operating with a suspended or revoked license prior
to restoration of operating privileges 12 points
(7) Obtaining a license by misrepresentation 12 points
(8) For the first conviction of driving while in an
intoxicated condition or under the influence of
controlled substances or drugs 8 points
(9) For the second or subsequent conviction of any of
the following offenses however combined: driving
while in an intoxicated condition, driving under the
influence of controlled substances or drugs or
driving with a blood alcohol content of eight-
hundredths of one percent or more by weight 12 points
(10) For the first conviction for driving with blood
alcohol content eight-hundredths of one percent or
more by weight
In violation of state law 8 points
In violation of a county or municipal ordinance or
federal law or regulation 8 points
(11) Any felony involving the use of a motor vehicle 12 points
(12) Knowingly permitting unlicensed operator to
operate a motor vehicle 4 points
(13) For a conviction for failure to maintain financial
responsibility pursuant to county or municipal
ordinance or pursuant to section 303.025 4 points
(14) Endangerment of a highway worker in violation of
section 304.585 4 points

HB 2351 3
(15) Aggravated endangerment of a highway worker in
violation of section 304.585 12 points
(16) For a conviction of violating a municipal ordinance
that prohibits tow truck operators from stopping at
or proceeding to the scene of an accident unless they
have been requested to stop or proceed to such
scene by a party involved in such accident or by an
officer of a public safety agency 4 points
(17) Endangerment of an emergency responder in
violation of section 304.894 4 points
(18) Aggravated endangerment of an emergency
responder in violation of section 304.894 12 points
(19) Failure to secure a load in violation of section
307.010 2 points
2. The director shall, as provided in subdivision (5) of subsection 1 of this section,
assess an operator points for a conviction pursuant to subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 1 of
section 302.020, when the director issues such operator a license or permit pursuant to the
provisions of sections 302.010 to 302.340.
3. An additional two points shall be assessed when personal injury or property
damage results from any violation listed in subdivisions (1) to (13) of subsection 1 of this
section and if found to be warranted and certified by the reporting court.
4. When any of the acts listed in subdivision (2), (3), (4) or (8) of subsection 1 of this
section constitutes both a violation of a state law and a violation of a county or municipal
ordinance, points may be assessed for either violation but not for both. Notwithstanding that
an offense arising out of the same occurrence could be construed to be a violation of
subdivisions (8), (9) and (10) of subsection 1 of this section, no person shall be tried or
convicted for more than one offense pursuant to subdivisions (8), (9) and (10) of subsection 1
of this section for offenses arising out of the same occurrence.
5. The director of revenue shall put into effect a system for staying the assessment of
points against an operator. The system shall provide that the satisfactory completion of a
driver-improvement program or, in the case of violations committed while operating a
motorcycle, a motorcycle-rider training course approved by the state highways and
transportation commission, by an operator, when so ordered and verified by any court
having jurisdiction over any law of this state or county or municipal ordinance, regulating
motor vehicles, other than a violation committed in a commercial motor vehicle as defined in
section 302.700 or a violation committed by an individual who has been issued a commercial

HB 2351 4
driver's license or is required to obtain a commercial driver's license in this state or any other
state, shall be accepted by the director in lieu of the assessment of points for a violation
pursuant to subdivision (1), (2) or (4) of subsection 1 of this section or pursuant to subsection
3 of this section. The operator shall be given the option to complete the driver-improvement
program through an online or in-person course. A court using a centralized violation bureau
established under section 476.385 may elect to have the bureau order and verify completion
of a driver-improvement program or motorcycle-rider training course as prescribed by order
of the court. For the purposes of this subsection, the driver-improvement program shall meet
or exceed the standards of the National Safety Council's eight-hour "Defensive Driving
Course" or, in the case of a violation which occurred during the operation of a motorcycle, the
program shall meet the standards established by the state highways and transportation
commission pursuant to sections 302.133 to 302.137. The completion of a driver-
100 improvement program or a motorcycle-rider training course shall not be accepted in lieu of
101 points more than one time in any thirty-six-month period and shall be completed within sixty
102 days of the date of conviction in order to be accepted in lieu of the assessment of points.
103 Every court having jurisdiction pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall, within
104 fifteen days after completion of the driver-improvement program or motorcycle-rider training
105 course by an operator, forward a record of the completion to the director, all other provisions
106 of the law to the contrary notwithstanding. The director shall establish procedures for record
107 keeping and the administration of this subsection.
✔